New York, session 2025-2026, S9370.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph b of subdivision 4 of section 2 163 of the state finance law, as amended by section 7 of part L of chap- 3 ter 55 of the laws of 2012, is amended to read as follows: 4 (i) Centralized contracts for services may be procured by the office 5 of general services at the request of state agencies or as determined by 6 the commissioner. The purchase of services by state agencies, except 7 state agencies where the head of the agency is not appointed by the 8 governor, including but not limited to the state education department, 9 the department of law, and the department of audit and control, [shall] 10 may be conducted in a manner that accords second priority to centralized 11 contracts meeting form, function and utility required by said agency, 12 third priority to agency or multi-agency established contracts and 13 fourth priority to other means of contracting. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 15 the amendments to section 163 of the state finance law made by section 16 one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall 17 expire and be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14989-01-6